Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201847-109
Jails; inspection; duty of grand juries and county boards; reports.

The grand jury of each county in this state may, while in attendance, visit the jail, examine its state and condition, and examine and inquire into the discipline and treatment of prisoners, their habits, diet, and accommodations. If the grand jury visits a jail, it shall be its duty to report to the court in writing, whether the rules of the Jail Standards Board have been faithfully kept and observed, or whether any of the provisions of sections 47-101 to 47-116, have been violated, pointing out particularly in what the violation, if any, consists. It shall also be the duty of the county board of each county of this state to visit the jail of its county once during each of its sessions in January, April, July, and October of each year.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 9, p. 245;

R.S.1913, § 3537;

C.S.1922, § 3004;

C.S.1929, § 47-109;

R.S.1943, § 47-109;

Laws 1961, c. 232, § 1, p. 687;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB776, § 5.
July 19, 2018